Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1254
Motor vehicle operation with person
under age of sixteen years; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

(1) It shall
be unlawful for any person to operate or be in the actual physical control
of a motor vehicle with a person under the age of sixteen years as a passenger:

(a) While the
person operating or in the actual physical control of the motor vehicle is
under the influence of alcoholic liquor or any drug;

(b) When the person operating
or in the actual physical control of the motor vehicle has a concentration
of eight-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters of his or her blood;

(c) When the person operating or in the
actual physical control of the motor vehicle has a concentration of eight-hundredths
of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of his
or her breath; or

(d) If the person operating or in the actual physical control of
the motor vehicle refuses to submit to a chemical test or tests when directed
to do so by a peace officer pursuant to section 60-6,197.

(2) A violation
of this section shall be a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) The crime punishable
under this section shall be treated as a separate and distinct offense from
any other offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while
the person was in violation of this section.

Laws 2011, LB667, § 2.